District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.72c

Merger or consolidation — domestic corporation and partnership.

Repealed.

Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 72c, 39 DCR 4863
as added Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1206, 44 DCR 777
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.72c.
1981 Ed., § 29-372.3.